District of Columbia statutes.
29-406.04

Selection of directors.

(a)

The directors of a membership corporation, other than any initial directors named in the articles of incorporation or elected by the incorporators, shall be elected at the first annual meeting of members, and at each annual meeting thereafter, unless the articles or bylaws provide some other time or method of election, or provide that some or all of the directors are appointed by some other person or designated in some other manner.

(b)

The directors of a nonmembership corporation, other than any initial directors named in the articles of incorporation or elected by the incorporators, shall be elected, appointed, or designated as provided in the articles or bylaws. If no method of designation or appointment is set forth in the articles or bylaws, the directors, other than any initial directors, shall be elected by the board.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720